California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 Section 23038, which is located on the licensed premises or on premises owned by the licensee that are contiguous licensed premises and which is operated by and for the licensee, provided that any alcoholic beverage products not manufactured or produced by the licensee must be purchased from a licensed wholesaler. Beer, wine, and brandy may be used in the preparation of food and beverages in the bona fide public eating place for consumption on the premises.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, in the event that the licensee no longer qualifies as a craft distiller
 due to the amount of distilled spirits reported pursuant to Section 23502, the licensee may continue to hold the privileges granted by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 423, Sec. 5.   (AB 2913)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Music Venue License [23550. - 23552.]

23550.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “On-sale licensee” means a person holding an on-sale general music venue license to serve alcoholic beverages on the premises of a music entertainment facility.

(b) “Music venue license” means an on-sale general for music entertainment facility license issued pursuant to this article.

(c) “Music entertainment facility” means a publicly or privately owned live performance venue, concert hall, auditorium, or an enclosed arena where music or entertainment events are presented for a price of admission. The facility does not have to be used exclusively for music or entertainment events. A venue is not a “music
 entertainment facility” for purposes of this article unless it satisfies all of the following criteria:

(1) The facility has defined performance and audience spaces.

(2) The facility includes mixing equipment, a public address system, and a lighting rig.

(3) The facility employs one or more individuals to serve not less than two of the following roles:

(A) A sound engineer.

(B) A booker.

(C) A promoter.

(D) A stage manager.

(E) Security personnel.

(F) A box office manager.

(4) There is a paid ticket or cover charge to attend performances at the facility and artists are paid and do not play for free or solely for tips, except for fundraisers or similar charitable events.

(5) Performances at the facility are marketed through listings in printed or electronic publications, on websites, by mass email, or on social media.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 468, Sec. 2.   (SB 793)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23552.

(a) In addition to the licenses specified in Section 23320, the department may issue a music venue license to sell beer, wine, and distilled spirits at retail for consumption upon the premises only. A music venue licensee is eligible to obtain a duplicate license or licenses as described in Section 24042 and shall be subject to the same fees charged for a duplicate Type 47 license.

(b) The music venue license may be issued for a music entertainment facility providing alcoholic beverage service. Except as provided in this section, only licensees with a music venue license are authorized to sell beer, wine, and distilled spirits at retail for consumption upon the premises of the
 music entertainment facility. The license shall only be transferable from person to person at the same premises. A music venue license shall not be transferred or sold for a purchase price or consideration in excess of the original fee paid for that license.

(c) (1) Subject to Section 25631, the music venue licensee may sell, serve, and permit consumption of alcoholic beverages only during the time period from two hours before a live performance until one hour after the live performance.

(2) (A) A music venue licensee may also sell, serve, and permit consumption of alcoholic beverages to guests during private events or private functions not open to the general public within any hours of operation permitted by its license, regardless of whether
 any live performance occurs.

(B) (i) A music entertainment facility shall not be required to meet the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 23550 in connection with and during a private event or private function provided the facility’s principal purpose shall be to operate as a music entertainment facility. 

(ii) A music venue licenseholder must keep records at the licensed premises to show compliance with this paragraph for the preceding three calendar years. Records kept in compliance with this section must be provided to the department upon request pursuant to Section 25753. Failure to keep required records or to provide them to the department upon request shall be grounds for disciplinary action pursuant to Section 25616.

(iii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “principal purpose” shall mean that the number of private events or private functions occurring at the music entertainment facility does not exceed the number of live entertainment events occurring at the facility in any calendar year.

(d) (1) Issuance of the license shall be subject to the provisions of Section 23958.4.

(2) Issuance of the license shall not be subject to the provisions of Section 23816.

(e) An on-sale licensee may permit a person under 21 years of age into the music entertainment facility. This subdivision does not authorize the on-sale licensee to sell, furnish, or give any alcoholic
 beverages to a person under 21 years of age, or to engage in any other activity not otherwise authorized by this division.

(f) (1) An on-sale general bona fide public eating place licensee or an on-sale general public premises licensee as of the effective date of this section may exchange that license for a music venue license, subject to the qualifications of the premises as specified in this division. The exchange may be made at any time upon the approval of the department, the payment of an exchange fee of one hundred dollars ($100), and compliance with the provisions of this division relating to the issuance of an original license.

(2) The department may modify its rules regarding the surrender of licenses to implement this subdivision.

(g) The department may promulgate regulations to implement this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 700, Sec. 5.   (SB 76)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Imports [23660. - 23673.]

23660.

Postal authorities may refuse delivery of any shipment of alcoholic beverages originating outside this State. Postal authorities may turn alcoholic beverages over to the department. The alcoholic beverage when received shall be forfeited to the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23661.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, alcoholic beverages shall be brought into this state from without this state for delivery or use within the state only by common carriers and only when the alcoholic beverages are consigned to a licensed importer, and only when consigned to the premises of the licensed importer or to a licensed importer or customs broker at the premises of a public warehouse licensed under this division.

(b) The provisions of this chapter are not applicable in the case of alcoholic beverages which are sold and delivered by a licensee in this state to another licensee in this state, and which in the course of delivery
 are taken without this state through another state without any storage thereof in such other state.

(c) The provisions of subdivision (a) are not applicable in the case of a reasonable amount of alcoholic beverages brought into this state by an adult from without the United States for personal or household use, except that a California resident returning to the United States by a vehicle that is not a common carrier, or any adult entering the United States as a pedestrian, shall be restricted to the amount of alcoholic beverages which are exempt from the payment of duty in accordance with existing provisions of federal law. These alcoholic beverages shall be exempt from state licensing restrictions.

(d) The provisions of subdivision (a) are not applicable to incidental amounts
 of alcoholic beverages brought into this state by an adult for personal use from a hotel that is jointly located within the jurisdictions of this state and Nevada.

(e) The provisions of subdivision (a) are not applicable in the case of alcoholic beverages shipped into this state from without the United States by an adult member of the Armed Forces of the United States, serving outside the confines of the United States, for their personal or household use within the state in such quantity of alcoholic beverages as is exempt from the payment of duty under existing provisions of the Federal Tariff Act or regulations. These alcoholic beverages may be brought into this state only by common carrier and consigned to the premises of a licensed importer or customs broker, or to a licensed importer or customs broker at the premises of a public warehouse
 licensed under this division. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this division, the holder of an importer’s license, a customs broker’s license, or a public warehouse license, may make delivery of such alcoholic beverages as may be brought into this state under the provisions of this paragraph directly to the owner thereof upon satisfactory proof of identity. This delivery shall not be deemed to constitute a sale in this state.

(f) A manufacturer of distilled spirits shall transport such distilled spirits into this state in motor vehicles owned by or leased to the manufacturer, and operated by employees of the manufacturer, only if all of the following apply:

(1) The distilled spirits are transported into this state from a place of manufacture within the United States.

(2) The manufacturer holds a California distilled spirits manufacturer’s license.

(3) Delivery is made to the licensed premises of such distilled spirits manufacturer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 355, Sec. 2.   (AB 840)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

23661.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an adult passenger on board a chartered airplane on a flight which commences and terminates in the continental United States and which does not land outside the continental United States, may bring not to exceed one quart of alcoholic beverages into this State for household or personal use. Such alcoholic beverages shall be exempt from state licensing restrictions. No person shall bring in more than one quart of alcoholic beverages during any calendar year pursuant to the authority granted in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1683.)
-------------------------------------------

23661.2.

Notwithstanding any other law, an individual or retail licensee in a state that affords California retail licensees or individuals an equal reciprocal shipping privilege, may ship, for personal use and not for resale, no more than two cases of wine (no more than nine liters each case) per month to any adult resident in this state. Delivery of a shipment pursuant to this subdivision shall not be deemed to constitute a sale in this state.

The shipping container of any wine sent into or out of this state under this section shall be clearly labeled to indicate that the container cannot be delivered to a minor or an intoxicated person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 157, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

23661.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, any person currently licensed in this state or any other state as a winegrower who obtains a wine direct shipper permit pursuant to this section may sell and ship wine directly to a resident of California, who is at least 21 years of age, for the resident’s personal use and not for resale.

Before sending any shipment to a resident of California, the wine direct shipper permitholder must:

(1) File an application with the department.

(2) Pay the application fee as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 23320 if the winegrower is not currently licensed by the department.

(3) Provide the department its California alcoholic beverage license number or a true copy of its current alcoholic beverage license issued by another state.

(4) Obtain from the department a wine direct shipper permit.

(5) Obtain a seller’s permit or register with the State Board of Equalization pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(6) Register with the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery as a beverage manufacturer and distributor, as those terms are defined in the California Beverage Container Recycling and Litter Reduction Act (Division 12.1 (commencing with Section 14500) of the Public Resources
 Code).

(b) A wine direct shipper permit authorizes the permitholder to do all of the following:

(1) Sell and ship wine to any person 21 years of age or older for their personal use and not for resale.

(2) Ship wine directly to a resident in this state only in containers that are conspicuously labeled with the words: “CONTAINS ALCOHOL: SIGNATURE OF PERSON AGE 21 YEARS OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY.”

(3) Ship wine only if the permitholder requires the carrier to obtain the signature of any individual 21 years of age or older before delivering any wine shipped to an individual in this state.

(4) If the permitholder is located outside of this state, report to the
 department no later than January 31 of each year, the total amount of wine shipped into the state during the preceding calendar year under the wine direct shipper permit.

(5) If the permitholder is located outside of this state, pay to the State Board of Equalization all sales and use taxes, and excise taxes on sales to residents of California under the wine direct shipper permit. For excise tax purposes, all wine sold pursuant to a direct shipper permit shall be deemed to be wine sold in this state.

(6) If located within this state, provide the department any necessary additional information not currently provided to ensure compliance with this section.

(7) Permit the department or the State Board of Equalization to perform an audit of the wine direct shipper permitholder’s records upon request.

(8) Be deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the department or any other state agency and the California courts concerning enforcement of this section any related laws, rules, or regulations.

(c) A wine direct shipper permitholder shall comply with the California Beverage Container Recycling and Litter Reduction Act (Division 12.1 (commencing with Section 14500) of the Public Resources Code), including, but not limited to, the reporting and payment provisions applicable to the permitholder as a beverage manufacturer and distributor. If the permitholder fails to comply with Section 14560 or 14575 of the Public Resources Code, the department may suspend or revoke the wine direct shipper permit in the manner provided for in this section.

(d) A wine direct shipper permitholder located outside of the state may annually renew its permit with the department by paying an annual fee as specified in subdivision (b), and adjusted pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 23320 and providing the department with a true copy of its current alcoholic beverage license issued by another state. A wine direct shipper permitholder located in California shall renew its wine direct shipper permit in conjunction with its master license. For purposes of this section, “master license” means a winegrower’s license issued by the department.

(e) The department, the State Board of Equalization, and the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery may promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this law.

(f) The department may enforce the requirements of this section by
 administrative proceedings to suspend or revoke the wine direct shipper permit, and the department may accept payment of an offer in compromise in lieu of suspension as provided by this division. Any hearing held pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code against a permitholder outside of California shall be held in Sacramento.

(g) Sales and shipments of wine direct to consumers in California from winegrowers who do not possess a current wine direct shipper permit from the department are prohibited. Any person who knowingly makes, participates in, transports, imports, or receives such a shipment is
 guilty of a misdemeanor pursuant to Section 25617.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 1.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23661.5.

A person who manufactures or produces wine or beer outside of this state, but within the United States, in accordance with the requirements of the laws of the United States, may transport such wine or beer into this state, in a vehicle owned and operated by the manufacturer or producer or operated by him pursuant to a lease the term of which is not less than 30 days, or by contract carrier, for delivery to a licensee who is authorized under this division to import the wine or beer into this state, if:

(a) The delivery is made at the premises of the licensee or to a licensee or a licensed customs broker at the premises of a public warehouse licensed under this division; and

(b) The manufacturer or producer holds a manufacturer’s interstate alcoholic beverage transporter’s permit under Section 32110 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1075.)
-------------------------------------------

23661.6.

A licensed winegrower who in the course of business exports wine from this State to another state, may subsequently return to his licensed premises in this State all or any portion of such wine in private vehicles owned or under the control of the winegrower. Any wine so returned shall be subject to the provisions of Section 32175 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 903.)
-------------------------------------------

23661.7.

(a) A person who has purchased wine from a licensed winegrower, the holder of a beer and wine wholesaler’s license and an off-sale retail license that only sells wine, or the holder of a limited off-sale retail wine license, has taken delivery of that wine within this state for delivery or use without the state, and has removed that wine from the state, may return all or any portion of that wine to the premises of the licensee from whom the wine was purchased. To make a return the purchaser need not obtain any license in this state, and may return the wine in a vehicle owned or controlled by the purchaser.

(b) The provisions of Section 32175 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall apply to any wine so
 returned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 292, Sec. 2.   (AB 623)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

23662.

A shipment shall be deemed to be consigned to a licensed importer, although originally consigned to a person not so licensed, when the shipment is, before delivery and without leaving the possession of the common carrier transporting it, reconsigned or diverted in transit by either the consignor or consignee to a licensed importer to whom final delivery by the common carrier is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23663.

Alcoholic beverages which are consigned to a destination within this State shall be presumed to be for delivery or use within this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23664.

A railroad, sleeping car, dining car, boat, or steamship company or air common carrier carrying interstate or foreign passengers on trains, boats, or airplanes shall not be deemed to be an importer or subject to an importer’s license for bringing into this State alcoholic beverages for the purpose of sale within this State on the trains, cars, boats, or airplanes on which the alcoholic beverages are brought into this State exclusively to passengers or employees not on duty, and for carrying the same alcoholic beverages or any unsold portion thereof out of this State in due course of operation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 954.)
-------------------------------------------

23666.

Alcoholic beverages imported into this State contrary to the provisions of Sections 23661 to 23664, inclusive, shall be seized by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

23667.

Common carriers transporting alcoholic beverages into this State for delivery or use within this State or common carriers making delivery of alcoholic beverages so transported shall obtain from the licensed importer or customs broker a receipt on a form prescribed by the department for the alcoholic beverages so transported and delivered. If the consignee refuses to give the receipt and show his license to the carrier, the carrier is relieved of all responsibility for delivery of the alcoholic beverages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23668.

Subject to the provisions of Section 23662, whenever the consignee is not a licensed importer or customs broker or whenever the consignee refuses to give his receipt and show his license, the carrier shall immediately notify the department at Sacramento giving full details as to the character of shipment, point of origin, destination, and address of the consignor and consignee, and within 10 days the alcoholic beverages shall be delivered to the department and shall be forfeited to the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23669.

If any alcoholic beverages seized under Section 23666 or forfeited under Section 23668 are sold by or under the direction of the department, the common carrier’s unpaid freight and storage charges accruing on the shipments of the alcoholic beverages shall be satisfied out of the proceeds of any sale made by the State after deducting the cost of the sale and any excise taxes accruing thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23670.

Every person violating the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23671.

No beer importer shall purchase any beer not manufactured within the state or cause any beer to be transported into the state for sale in the state, unless the out-of-state vendor making shipment of the beer into the state holds a certificate of compliance issued by the department. A certificate of compliance shall be granted when the out-of-state vendor makes a written agreement with the department to furnish to the board, on or before the 10th day of each month, a report on a form prescribed by the board, showing the quantity of beer shipped by the out-of-state vendor to each licensed beer importer in this state during the preceding month. The out-of-state vendor shall further agree that it and its agents and all agencies within this state controlled by it will comply with all laws of this state and all rules of the department with respect to the sale of alcoholic beverages, including, but not limited to, Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 25000) of Division 9, and Section 25509, to the same extent as licensees.

If any out-of-state vendor, after obtaining the certificate, fails to submit the report or to comply with Section 14575 of the Public Resources Code, the department may suspend or revoke the certificate of compliance in the manner provided for the suspension or revocation of licenses, and after a hearing which shall be held in the City of Sacramento or in any other county seat in this state which the department determines to be convenient to the holder of the certificate. No fee shall be charged for the certificate of compliance which shall remain in effect until revoked by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 49, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

23672.

A licensed importer shall not purchase or accept delivery of any brand of distilled spirits unless he is designated as an authorized importer of such brand by the brand owner or his authorized agent. Such distilled spirits imported into California shall come to rest at the warehouse of the licensed importer or an authorized warehouse for the account of such licensed importer, before sale and delivery to a retail licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 280.)
-------------------------------------------

23673.

No brand owner of distilled spirits or his agent shall sell any brand of distilled spirits to a wholesaler or rectifier in this state at a price higher than the lowest price at which such brand of distilled spirits is sold by such brand owner or his agent to any wholesaler or rectifier during any calendar month anywhere in any other state or in the District of Columbia or to any state or state agency which owns or operates retail distilled spirits stores.

In determining the lowest price for which any brand of distilled spirits is sold in any other state or the District of Columbia or to any state or state agency which owns and operates retail distilled spirits stores, appropriate reduction shall be made to reflect all discounts, all rebates, allowances, and other inducements of any kind whatsoever offered or given to any such wholesaler or state, or state agency, as the case may be, purchasing such brand of distilled spirits in such other state or in the District of Columbia or to the state or state agency which owns or operates retail distilled spirits stores; provided that nothing in this section shall prevent differentials in price which make only due allowance for differences in state excise taxes and fees and the actual cost of delivery. As used in this section, the term “excise taxes and license fees” shall mean the excise taxes imposed or the fees required by any state or the District of Columbia.

A violation of this section shall be remediable only by a civil action for damages or an action to enjoin a brand owner or his agent from continued violation brought by any person suffering loss as a result of such violation. A judgment in any such action rendered against a licensee shall be deemed grounds for the suspension or revocation of the violator’s license pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 24200) of this division.

For the purposes of this section, “distilled spirits” does not include brandy produced in California. No California brandy manufacturer or his agent shall be required to file an affidavit pursuant to this section for California brandy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 407.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Restrictions on Issuance of Licenses [23770. - 23827.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [23770. - 23794.]

23770.

A winegrower’s license, or a wine blender’s license, whichever is appropriate to the operations to be conducted on the licensed premises, shall be issued only to, or held by, a person qualified to operate or operating a winery or wine cellar bonded under the internal revenue laws of the United States. Every person operating, or authorized under the internal revenue laws of the United States to operate, a winery or wine cellar bonded under the internal revenue laws of the United States shall apply for, and hold, a winegrower’s or wine blender’s license, as may be appropriate for operations conducted on the licensed premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 499.)
-------------------------------------------

23771.

Except as provided in Section 23771.5, a distilled spirits license of any kind, except a distilled spirits manufacturer’s, a craft distiller’s, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent’s license, shall not be issued to any person, or to any officer, director, employee, or agent of any person that manufactures distilled spirits within or without this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 695, Sec. 5.   (SB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23771.5.

Section 23771 does not prevent a licensed craft distiller from holding a distilled spirits license authorizing the importing of distilled spirits, provided, however, that any distilled spirits imported by the licensee shall only be used by the licensee to manufacture or produce distilled spirits pursuant to Section 23502.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 423, Sec. 6.   (AB 2913)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

23772.

(a) A distilled spirits manufacturer’s or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent’s license shall not be held by any person that holds any ownership or interest, directly or indirectly, by stock ownership, interlocking directors, trusteeship, loan, mortgage, or lien on any personal or real property, or otherwise, in any craft distiller’s, distilled spirits wholesaler’s, rectifier’s, or retailer’s license.

(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to the financial or representative relationship between a manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler, or any officer, director, or agent
 of that person, and a person holding only one of the following types of licenses:

(1) On-sale general license for a bona fide club.

(2) Club license (issued under Article 4 (commencing at Section 23425) of Chapter 3).

(3) Veterans’ club license (issued under Article 5 (commencing at Section 23450) of Chapter 3).

(4) On-sale license for boats, trains, sleeping cars, or airplanes where the alcoholic beverages produced or sold by the manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, rectifier, bottler, importer, or wholesaler or any officer, director, or agent of that person are not sold, furnished, or given, directly or indirectly, to the on-sale
 licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 640, Sec. 4.   (AB 1295)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

23773.

The provisions of Sections 23771 and 23772 do not prevent agents or employees of a distilled spirits manufacturer located without this State from soliciting orders for distilled spirits within the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23774.

The provisions of Sections 23771 and 23772 do not prevent the issuance of a distilled spirits wholesale license to any person who, on July 1, 1937, owned or operated a business which for five years immediately preceding that date had maintained and operated in this State a bona fide jobbing and distributing establishment for the sale to retail dealers of goods, wares, and merchandise, the major portion of which business at a time five years preceding July 1, 1937, was goods, wares, and merchandise other than alcoholic beverages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23775.

An importer’s license shall be issued only to a person or manufacturer who holds a license authorizing the sale for resale of the types of alcoholic beverages mentioned in the importer’s license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23776.

A wholesaler’s license shall not be issued or renewed to any on-sale or off-sale licensee, except that:

(1) A wholesaler’s license restricted to sales to on-sale licensees may be issued or renewed to an on-sale licensee in counties not to exceed 15,000 population, or

(2) If restricted to the wholesaler’s sale of wine, a beer and wine wholesaler’s license may be renewed for the holder of an off-sale beer and wine licensee who on December 31, 1987, held an off-sale beer and wine license and a beer and wine wholesaler’s license, provided that the beer and wine wholesaler’s license restricted to the wholesaler’s sale of wine can only be transferred to the holder of a beer and wine wholesaler’s license restricted to the wholesaler’s sale of wine on the date of transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 284, Sec. 2.   Effective July 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

23777.

No off-sale general license shall be renewed or issued to a distilled spirits wholesaler whose premises are located in a city having a population of 50,000 or more, as shown by the 1940 federal census, or to a distilled spirits wholesaler who sells distilled spirits to licensees whose premises are located in any city having a population of 50,000 or more, as shown by the 1940 federal census.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23778.

A distilled spirits wholesaler’s license shall not be held by any person unless at all times throughout the license year he has on his wholesale premises a reasonable stock of distilled spirits, as determined by the department, for which he has fully paid lawful money or its equivalent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23779.

No wholesale license shall be issued to any person who does not in good faith actually carry on or intend to carry on a bona fide wholesale business by sale to retail licensees of the alcoholic beverage designated in the wholesale license, and the department may revoke any wholesale license when the licensee fails for a period of 45 days actively and in good faith to engage in the wholesale business and shall revoke any distilled spirits wholesaler’s license held by any person who fails to comply with applicable provisions of Sections 23378, 23379, 23776, 23777, and 23778. Sale by a wholesale licensee to himself as a retail licensee is not the transaction of a bona fide wholesale business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23780.

No distilled spirits wholesaler’s license or rectifier’s license shall be issued or renewed to any person who holds on deposit funds obtained from any retailer, which funds were obtained for the purpose of applying them, either in whole or in part, toward the payment of any future delivery of distilled spirits to the retailer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23784.

No retailer’s on-sale license shall be issued to any person to whom, or for any premises for which, a manufacturer's, wine grower's, importer's, wholesaler's, or rectifier’s license is issued; and no manufacturer's, wine grower's, importer's, wholesaler's, or rectifier’s license shall be issued to any person to whom, or for any premises for which, a retailer’s on-sale license is issued, except that a retailer’s on-sale license may be issued to a wholesaler in counties not to exceed 15,000 population.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 246.)
-------------------------------------------

23785.

A retail package off-sale general license, when issued to the holder of a rectifier’s or distilled spirits wholesaler’s license, shall be issued only for the same premises for which the rectifier’s or distilled spirits wholesaler’s license is issued, except as otherwise provided or permitted in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23786.

(a) The department may issue a special nonprofit sales license to a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation, as described in the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), or a nonprofit public benefit corporation, as described in the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), that has a board membership composed of the Dean of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences, or their designee, the Chair of the Department of Viticulture and Enology, or their designee, and the Chair of the Department of Food Science and Technology, or their designee, of the public
 university located within the county of the 28th class that includes courses in viticulture and enology in its curriculum.

(b) A special nonprofit sales license authorizes the licensee to do all of the following:

(1) Accept the transfer of, and take title to, up to 20,000 gallons of wine per year produced by the public university described in subdivision (a), notwithstanding that the public university does not hold any license issued pursuant to this division. For purposes of this section, “produced” includes wine donated to, or purchased by, the public university for educational or experimental purposes and that are thereafter treated or processed by the public university.

(2) Sell wine received pursuant to paragraph (1)
 to consumers for consumption off the licensed premises or to other licensees authorized to sell wine.

(3) Give licensees samples of the wine it sells, subject to the limitations in subdivision (a) of Section 23386 and any department regulations.

(c) The special nonprofit sales license does not authorize the licensee to purchase or otherwise obtain wine from a licensee or other manufacturer or seller of wine, except as specified in this section.

(d) A public university, as described in subdivision (a), may transfer wine produced by the public university to a special nonprofit sales licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 362, Sec. 1.   (SB 918)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

23787.

The department shall, before issuing any on-sale license for the sale of alcoholic beverages to be consumed or otherwise disposed of in any bona fide public eating place, determine whether the public eating place is equipped and maintained in good faith for sales to and consumption by the public of meals upon the premises. A hotel or motel of 75 rooms or more or a bowling center of 12 lanes or more, or any other bona fide public eating place, which hotel, motel, bowling center or bona fide public eating place is licensed and so equipped and maintained may sublet the sale and service of the meals required by Section 23038 upon notification to the department. Provided, however, that the licensee shall be responsible for any violations of this division caused or permitted by the lessee on the licensed premises. The licensee shall not sublet to a person who does not have the qualifications of a holder of a license.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the renewal, transfer, or issuance of an on-sale general license to any premises equipped and maintained in good faith for sales to and consumption by members of the public of meals upon the premises even though the operation of such premises is limited solely to the service of meals and beverages at prearranged events of a social or business nature and where admission is by ticket only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1184.)
-------------------------------------------

23788.5.
